New York, session 2025-2026, S3565.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 375 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 58 to read as follows: 3 58. Rear occupant alert systems. It shall be unlawful for any person, 4 firm, association or corporation to sell or offer for sale in this state 5 a new passenger motor vehicle weighing less than ten thousand pounds 6 gross vehicle weight which is to be registered in this state and which 7 was manufactured or assembled one year or more after the date upon which 8 the national highway traffic safety administration promulgates final 9 regulations establishing standards for rear occupant alert systems, and 10 designated as a vehicle for such model year or as a newer model year 11 vehicle, unless such vehicle is equipped with a rear occupant alert 12 system. For the purposes of this subdivision, "rear occupant alert 13 system" shall mean a system to alert the operator to check rear-desig- 14 nated seating positions after the vehicle engine or motor is deactivated 15 by the operator, and the term "passenger motor vehicle" shall include 16 only those motor vehicles capable of being registered pursuant to subdi- 17 vision six of section four hundred one of this chapter which have rear 18 seats. 19 § 2. Severability. If any clause, sentence, subdivision, paragraph, 20 section or part of this act be adjudged by any court of competent juris- 21 diction to be invalid, or if any federal agency determines in writing 22 that this act would render New York state ineligible for the receipt of 23 federal funds, such judgment or written determination shall not affect, 24 impair or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05283-01-5 S. 3565 2 1 operation to the clause, sentence, subdivision, paragraph, section or 2 part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment 3 or written determination shall have been rendered. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 5 this act shall be deemed repealed if any federal agency determines in 6 writing that this act would render New York state ineligible for the 7 receipt of federal funds or any court of competent jurisdiction finally 8 determines that this act would render New York state out of compliance 9 with federal law or regulation; provided that the commissioner of motor 10 vehicles or the commissioner of transportation shall notify the legisla- 11 tive bill drafting commission upon the occurrence of any federal agency 12 determining in writing that this act would render New York state ineli- 13 gible for the receipt of federal funds or any court of competent juris- 14 diction finally determines that this act would render New York state out 15 of compliance with federal law or regulation in order that the commis- 16 sion may maintain an accurate and timely effective data base of the 17 official text of the laws of the state of New York in furtherance of 18 effectuating the provisions of section 44 of the legislative law and 19 section 70-b of the public officers law. Effective immediately, the 20 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 21 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 22 to be made and completed on or before such effective date.